Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.060

Administration with will annexed on death of executor.

No executor of an executor shall, as such, be authorized to administer upon the estate of the first testator, but on the death of the sole or surviving executor of any last will, letters of administration with the will annexed, on the estate of the first testator left unadministered, shall be issued.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.28.060. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 53; RRS s 1423; prior: Code 1881 s 1379; 1863 p 218 s 113; 1860 p 180 s 80.]

NOTES:

Executor of executor may not sue for estate of first testator: RCW 11.48.190.